Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3614
City or village; vote on proposal; criteria.

Within fifteen days after the public hearing under section 23-3613, the city or village governing body shall vote in open public session on whether or not to authorize the county to proceed with the development of the sewerage disposal system and plant or plants. The governing body shall base its decision on the following criteria:

(1) Whether the development of the proposed sewerage disposal system and plant or plants is consistent with the sewerage system of the city or village and the comprehensive development plan of the county;

(2) Whether the proposed sewerage disposal system and plant or plants will enhance the possibility for industrial or commercial development in the area it will serve;

(3) Whether the proposed sewerage disposal system and plant or plants will encourage additional residential development in the area it will serve;

(4) Whether the county has developed appropriate plans and procedures to address the possibility of future residential development in the area and to ensure that such development proceeds in a fashion consistent with the standards established by the city or village for development within its area of jurisdiction for platting and zoning purposes;

(5) Whether the county has proposed measures for cooperative action between the city or village and the county to address matters of concern with regard to the sewerage disposal system and plant or plants, its development, or related development issues;

(6) Whether the city or village is willing to proceed with the development of the proposed sewerage disposal system and plant or plants as its own project or in cooperation with the county;

(7) Whether the land development projects occurring as a result of the development of the sewerage disposal system and plant or plants will require additional infrastructure expenditures to support the proposed industrial or commercial development and the impact of such required infrastructure expenditures upon then current city or village and county capital improvement plans; and

(8) Whether the projected commercial or industrial development occurring as a result of the development of the sewerage disposal system and plant or plants will have a positive or adverse impact upon the economy of the city or village and the county.

Unless a number of members of the city or village governing body equal to two-thirds or more of its elected members vote against authorizing the county to proceed with the development of the sewerage disposal system and plant or plants, the county may proceed with the development of the system at the discretion of the county board.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 14.